Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 7.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-629
Rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to carry out the Commercial Dog and Cat Operator Inspection Act. The rules
and regulations may include, but are not limited to, factors to be considered
when the department imposes an administrative fine, provisions governing record-keeping, veterinary care plans, emergency veterinary
care plans, and other requirements for persons required to have
a license, and any other matter deemed necessary by the department to carry
out the act. The department shall use as a guideline for the humane handling,
care, treatment, and transportation of dogs and cats the standards of the
Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service of the United States Department
of Agriculture as set out in 9 C.F.R. 3.1 to 3.19.

Laws 2000, LB 825, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB12, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB241, § 7.